Washington statutes.
RCW 11.130.515

Inventory—Records.

(1) Not later than ninety days after appointment, a conservator shall prepare and file with the appointing court a detailed inventory of the conservatorship estate, together with an oath or affirmation that the inventory is believed to be complete and accurate as far as information permits.

(2) A conservator shall give notice of the filing of an inventory to the individual subject to conservatorship, a person entitled to notice under RCW 11.130.420(6) or a subsequent order, and any other person the court determines. The notice must be given not later than fourteen days after the filing.

(3) A conservator shall keep records of the administration of the conservatorship estate and make them available for examination on reasonable request of the individual subject to conservatorship, a guardian for the individual, or any other person the conservator or the court determines.

[ 2020 c 312 s 220; 2019 c 437 s 420.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2020 c 312: See note following RCW 11.130.915.